src/closed-smn-lex.txt
! This file contains the following parts of speech:

! Pronouns
! Subjunctions
! Conjunctions
! Numerals
! Particles
! Interjections

! Pronouns
! ========

! Pointing to all the pronominal subgroups
LEXICON Pronoun
Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Reflexive ;
! Reciprocal ;
Interrogative ;
! Relative ;
! Indefinite ;


! Personal pronouns
! -----------------

LEXICON Personal
mun+Pron+Pers:m perspron ;
tun+Pron+Pers:t perspron ;
sun+Pron+Pers:s perspron ;

LEXICON perspron
:u	    perspronsgdu ;
:i	    perspronpl ;


LEXICON perspronsgdu
+Sg+Nom:n	K ;
+Sg+Gen:u	      K ;
+Sg+Acc:u	      K ;
+Sg+Ill:njin	      K ;
+Sg+Loc:st	      K ;
+Sg+Loc:ste	      K ;
+Sg+Com:in	      K ;
+Sg+Com:uin	      K ;
+Sg+Abe:utáá	      K ;
+Sg+Ess:nen	      K ;
+Sg+Par:d1e	      K ;
+Du+Nom:oi	K ;
+Du+Gen:nnuu	      K ;
+Du+Acc:nnuu	      K ;
+Du+Ill:nnui	      K ;
+Du+Loc:nnust	      K ;
+Du+Com:nnuin	      K ;
+Du+Com:nnuuin	      K ;
+Du+Abe:nnuuttáá      K ;
+Du+Ess:nnun	      K ;
+Du+Par:nnud	      K ;

LEXICON perspronpl
+Pl+Nom:j		K ;
+Pl+Gen:i	      K ;
+Pl+Acc:j	      K ;
+Pl+Ill:jjân	      K ;
+Pl+Loc:st	      K ;
+Pl+Loc:ste	      K ;
+Pl+Com:iguim	      K ;
+Pl+Abe:ittáá	      K ;
+Pl+Ess:nen	      K ;
+Pl+Par:d1e	      K ;



! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON Demonstrative
tot+Pron+Dem:	TOT ;
tuot+Pron+Dem:	TUOT ;
tot+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill:toos K ;
tuot+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill:tuos K ;
tot+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill:tooid K ;

LEXICON TOT
:to	TO-TUO ;
:ta	TA-TYE ;

LEXICON TUOT
:tuo	TO-TUO ;
:tye	TA-TYE ;

LEXICON TO-TUO
+Sg+Nom:t	K ;
+Sg+Gen:n	K ;
+Sg+Acc:m	K ;
+Sg+Com:in	K ;
+Sg+Abe:ntáá	K ;
+Pl+Nom:h	K ;
+Pl+Gen:i	K ;
+Pl+Ill:id	K ;
+Pl+Com:iguim	K ;
+Pl+Abe:ittáá	K ;

LEXICON TA-TYE
+Sg+Loc:st	K ;
+Sg+Ess:nen	K ;
+Sg+Par:d1e	K ;
+Pl+Acc:id	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in	K ;




! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------

LEXICON Reflexive
# ;

! Interrogative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON Interrogative
mii+Pron+Interr:m	MK ;
kii+Pron+Interr:k	MK ;
mii+Pron+Interr:moo	MK-long ;
kii+Pron+Interr:kiä	MK-long ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mo	MK-short ;
kii+Pron+Interr:kiä	MK-short ;
mii+Pron+Interr:ma	MK-low ;
kii+Pron+Interr:kiä	MK-low ;
mii+Pron+Interr:ma	MK-front ;
kii+Pron+Interr:ke	MK-front ;

mii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:maid    K ; ! The exceptions
mii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:mon     K ;
mii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com:mooin   K ;
mii+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc:mooi    K ;
mii+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com:mooiguim	 K ;
mii+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abe:mooittáá	 K ;
kii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:kiäm    K ;
kii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc:kest    K ;
kii+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc:kein    K ;


LEXICON MK
+Sg+Nom:ii	K ;

LEXICON MK-long
+Sg+Ill:s	K ;
+Pl+Com:iguim	K ;

LEXICON MK-short
+Sg+Gen:n	K ;
+Sg+Com:in	K ;
+Sg+Abe:nttáá	K ;
+Pl+Nom:h	K ;
+Pl+Gen:i	K ;
+Pl+Abe:ittáá	K ;

LEXICON MK-low
+Sg+Loc:st	K ;
+Pl+Acc:id	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in	K ;

LEXICON MK-front
+Ess:nen	K ;
+Par:d1e	K ;
